DI-48
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DTC P0300/93 | Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected

DTC P030 1/93Cylinder 1 Misfire Detected

DTC P0302/93 | Cylinder 2 Misfire Detected

DTC P0303/93 | Cylinder 3 Misfire Detected

DTC P0304/93 | Cylinder 4 Misfire Detected

DTC P0305/93 | Cylinder 5 Misfire Detected

DTC P0306/93 | Cylinder 6 Misfire Detected

DTC P0307/93 | Cylinder 7 Misfire Detected

DTC P0308/93 | Cylinder 8 Misfire Detected

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Misfire: The engine ECU uses the crankshaft position sensor and camshaft position sensor to monitor
changes in the crankshaft rotation for each cylinder.

The engine ECU counts the number of times the engine speed change rate indicates that misfire has oc-
curred. And when the misfire rate equals or exceeds the count indicating that the engine condition has deteri-
orated, the check engine warning light lights up.

If the misfire rate is high enough and the driving conditions will cause catalyst overheating, the check engine
warning light blinks when misfiring occurs.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Misfiring of random cylinders is detected during any particular *Openorshortinengine wire
2000r 1,000revolutions « Connector connection
P0300/93 . . . . o . .
1 trip detection logic: check engine warning lightto brink *VVacuumhose connection
2trip detectionlogic: check engine warninglightto lightup « Ignition system
. . . e * Injector
P0301/93 Forany pz.amcular200 revolutions ofenglr.le, misfiringis de- « Fuelpressure
P0302/93 tect.ed which cancause .catalyst (.)ver.heatlng. « Watertemp. sensor
P0303/93 (This causes check engine warning lightto blink) « Compression pressure:
P0304/93 | Forany particular 1,000 revolutions of engine, misfiring is de- «Valve clearance
P0305/93 tected which causes adeteriorationin emissions *Valvetiming
P0306/93 | (2trip detectionlogic) «Engine ECU
HINT:

When codes for a misfiring cylinder is recorded repeatedly but no random misfire code is recorded, it indi-
cates that the misfires were detected and recorded at different times.
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(b) Record DTC and the freeze frame data.

) Use the hand-held tester to set to the Check (Test) Mode (See page DI-4).

(d) Drive the vehicle several times with the engine speed, load and its surrounding range shown with EN-
GINE SPD, CALC LOAD in the freeze frame data or MISFIRE RPM, MISFIRE LOAD in the data list.

Ifyouhavenohand -heldtester,turntheignition switch OFF afterthe symptomis simulatedthefirsttime.

Then repeat the simulation process again.

HINT:

In order to memorize DTC of misfire, it is necessary to drive around MISFIRE RPM, MISFIRE LOAD in the

data list for the following period of time.

Engine Speed Time
Idling 3 minutes 30 seconds or more
1,000rpm 3 minutes or more
2,000 rpm 1 minute 30 seconds ormore
3,000 rpm 1 minute ormore
(e) Check whether there is misfire or not by monitoring DTC and the freeze frame data. After that, record

them.
(f)  Turn the ignition switch OFF and wait at least 5 seconds.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. Ifitisthe casethat DTC besides misfire is memorized simultaneously, first perform the troubleshooting
for them.

. Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air —fuelratiowaslean orrich, etc. at
the time of the malfunction.

. Whenthe vehicle is broughtto the workshop and the misfire is not occurred, misfire can be confirmed
by reproducing the condition of freeze frame data. Also, after finishing the repair, confirm that there
is no misfire (See confirmation driving pattern).

. Wheneitherof SHORTFT# 1,LONGFT# 1,SHORTFT#20rLONGFT#2inthefreezeframedata

isbesidestherangeof + 20%,thereisapossibility thatthe air —fuelratioisinclining eitherto RICH
(-20% orless) or LEAN (+20 % or more).
«  WhenCOOLANTTEMP inthe freeze frame datais lessthan 80 °C (176°F), thereis a possibility of

misfire only during warmed up.
. Inthe case that misfire cannotbe reproduced, the reason may be because of the driving with lack of
fuel, the use of improper fuel, a stain of the ignition plug, and etc.

1 Checkwire harness, connectorand vacuumhose in engineroom.

CHECK:
(@) Check the connection conditions of wire harness and connector.
(b) Check the disconnection, piping and break of vacuum hose.

misfire (See confirmation driving pattern).

NG> Repair or replace, then confirm that there is no
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@

2 [ Check spark plug and spark of misfiring cylinder (See Pub. No. RM630E on page
1G-1).

RM630EonpagelG -1).

NG> Replace or check ignition system (See Pub. No.

@

3 | Check voltage of engine ECU terminals for injector of failed cylinder.

@ +) #HE) ﬁ‘)‘?jg’g #20 a) Removethe engine ECU hood.
—— e = ——— (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:
Measurethe voltage between applicableterminals# 10 — #80
of the engine ECU connectors and body ground.
OK:
Voltage:9 -14V

BEeoss = A05313

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

Withthe engineidling, check the waveform betweenterminals # 10 - #80andEO 1 oftheengine ECU con-
nectors.

HINT:

The correct waveform is as shown.

Injector Signal Waveform o
(Magnification)
10 V/ I 10 V/ :
Division T Division T
e T T T T llllgé!ll T
. \. \ \ I \ I
Al
GND GND 3
Fl6588 Fi6538 100 msec./Division (Idling) 1 msec./Division (Idling)
Injection duration A00064
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OK> Go to step 5.

B

4 | Check resistance of injector of misfiring cylinder (See Pub. No. RM630E on page
Fl-24).

NG> Replace injector.

@

Check for open and short in harness and connector between injector and engine ECU (See page
IN-19).

5 | Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI-1).

fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No. RM630E on
page FI-1).

NG> Check and repair fuel pump, pressure regulator,

OK
~_—

6 | Check injector injection (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI-29).

NG> Replace injector.
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7 | Check air flow meter and water temp. sensor (See Pub. No. RM630E on page
DI-27 and DI-39).

NG> Repair or replace.

OK
~_—

Check compression pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E on page EM-5), valve clearance (See Pub.
No. RM630E on page EM-6) and valve timing (See Pub. No. RM630E on page EM-14).
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